Illinois, session 104th, HB1056.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Prevailing Wage Act is amended by changing 5Section 2 as follows: 6    (820 ILCS 130/2)7    Sec. 2. This Act applies to the wages of laborers, 8mechanics and other workers employed in any public works, as 9hereinafter defined, by any public body and to anyone under 10contracts for public works. This includes any maintenance, 11repair, assembly, or disassembly work performed on equipment 12whether owned, leased, or rented.13    As used in this Act, unless the context indicates 14otherwise:15    "Public works" means all fixed works constructed or 16demolished by any public body, or paid for wholly or in part 17out of public funds, or on publicly-owned property. "Public 18works" as defined herein includes all projects financed in 19whole or in part with bonds, grants, loans, or other funds made 20available by or through the State or any of its political 21subdivisions, including but not limited to: bonds issued under 22the Industrial Project Revenue Bond Act (Article 11, Division 2374 of the Illinois Municipal Code), the Industrial Building   HB1056- 2 -LRB104 03146 SPS 13167 b1Revenue Bond Act, the Illinois Finance Authority Act, the 2Illinois Sports Facilities Authority Act, or the Build 3Illinois Bond Act; loans or other funds made available 4pursuant to the Build Illinois Act; loans or other funds made 5available pursuant to the Riverfront Development Fund under 6Section 10-15 of the River Edge Redevelopment Zone Act; or 7funds from the Fund for Illinois' Future under Section 6z-47 8of the State Finance Act, funds for school construction under 9Section 5 of the General Obligation Bond Act, funds authorized 10under Section 3 of the School Construction Bond Act, funds for 11school infrastructure under Section 6z-45 of the State Finance 12Act, and funds for transportation purposes under Section 4 of 13the General Obligation Bond Act. "Public works" also includes 14(i) all projects financed in whole or in part with funds from 15the Environmental Protection Agency under the Illinois 16Renewable Fuels Development Program Act for which there is no 17project labor agreement; (ii) all work performed pursuant to a 18public private agreement under the Public Private Agreements 19for the Illiana Expressway Act or the Public-Private 20Agreements for the South Suburban Airport Act; (iii) all 21projects undertaken under a public-private agreement under the 22Public-Private Partnerships for Transportation Act or the 23Department of Natural Resources World Shooting and 24Recreational Complex Act; and (iv) all transportation 25facilities undertaken under a design-build contract or a 26Construction Manager/General Contractor contract under the   HB1056- 3 -LRB104 03146 SPS 13167 b1Innovations for Transportation Infrastructure Act. "Public 2works" also includes all projects at leased facility property 3used for airport purposes under Section 35 of the Local 4Government Facility Lease Act. "Public works" also includes 5the construction of a new wind power facility by a business 6designated as a High Impact Business under Section 75.5(a)(3)(E) and the construction of a new utility-scale solar 8power facility by a business designated as a High Impact 9Business under Section 5.5(a)(3)(E-5) of the Illinois 10Enterprise Zone Act. "Public works" also includes electric 11vehicle charging station projects financed pursuant to the 12Electric Vehicle Act and renewable energy projects required to 13pay the prevailing wage pursuant to the Illinois Power Agency 14Act. "Public works" also includes power washing projects by a 15public body or paid for wholly or in part out of public funds 16in which steam or pressurized water, with or without added 17abrasives or chemicals, is used to remove paint or other 18coatings, oils or grease, corrosion, or debris from a surface 19or to prepare a surface for a coating. "Public works" does not 20include work done directly by any public utility company, 21whether or not done under public supervision or direction, or 22paid for wholly or in part out of public funds. "Public works" 23also includes construction projects performed by a third party 24contracted by any public utility, as described in subsection 25(a) of Section 2.1, in public rights-of-way, as defined in 26Section 21-201 of the Public Utilities Act, whether or not   HB1056- 4 -LRB104 03146 SPS 13167 b1done under public supervision or direction, or paid for wholly 2or in part out of public funds. "Public works" also includes 3construction projects that exceed 15 aggregate miles of new 4fiber optic cable, performed by a third party contracted by 5any public utility, as described in subsection (b) of Section 62.1, in public rights-of-way, as defined in Section 21-201 of 7the Public Utilities Act, whether or not done under public 8supervision or direction, or paid for wholly or in part out of 9public funds. "Public works" also includes any corrective 10action performed pursuant to Title XVI of the Environmental 11Protection Act for which payment from the Underground Storage 12Tank Fund is requested. "Public works" also includes all 13construction projects involving fixtures or permanent 14attachments affixed to light poles that are owned by a public 15body, including street light poles, traffic light poles, and 16other lighting fixtures, whether or not done under public 17supervision or direction, or paid for wholly or in part out of 18public funds, unless the project is performed by employees 19employed directly by the public body. "Public works" also 20includes work performed subject to the Mechanical Insulation 21Energy and Safety Assessment Act. "Public works" also includes 22the removal, hauling, and transportation of biosolids, lime 23sludge, and lime residue from a water treatment plant or 24facility and the disposal of biosolids, lime sludge, and lime 25residue removed from a water treatment plant or facility at a 26landfill. "Public works" does not include projects undertaken   HB1056- 5 -LRB104 03146 SPS 13167 b1by the owner at an owner-occupied single-family residence or 2at an owner-occupied unit of a multi-family residence. "Public 3works" does not include work performed for soil and water 4conservation purposes on agricultural lands, whether or not 5done under public supervision or paid for wholly or in part out 6of public funds, done directly by an owner or person who has 7legal control of those lands. 8    "Construction" means all work on public works involving 9laborers, workers or mechanics. This includes any maintenance, 10repair, assembly, or disassembly work performed on equipment 11whether owned, leased, or rented.12    "Locality" means the county where the physical work upon 13public works is performed, except (1) that if there is not 14available in the county a sufficient number of competent 15skilled laborers, workers and mechanics to construct the 16public works efficiently and properly, "locality" includes any 17other county nearest the one in which the work or construction 18is to be performed and from which such persons may be obtained 19in sufficient numbers to perform the work and (2) that, with 20respect to contracts for highway work with the Department of 21Transportation of this State, "locality" may at the discretion 22of the Secretary of the Department of Transportation be 23construed to include two or more adjacent counties from which 24workers may be accessible for work on such construction.25    "Public body" means the State or any officer, board or 26commission of the State or any political subdivision or   HB1056- 6 -LRB104 03146 SPS 13167 b1department thereof, or any institution supported in whole or 2in part by public funds, and includes every county, city, 3town, village, township, school district, irrigation, utility, 4reclamation improvement or other district and every other 5political subdivision, district or municipality of the state 6whether such political subdivision, municipality or district 7operates under a special charter or not.8    "Labor organization" means an organization that is the 9exclusive representative of an employer's employees recognized 10or certified pursuant to the National Labor Relations Act. 11    The terms "general prevailing rate of hourly wages", 12"general prevailing rate of wages" or "prevailing rate of 13wages" when used in this Act mean the hourly cash wages plus 14annualized fringe benefits for training and apprenticeship 15programs approved by the U.S. Department of Labor, Bureau of 16Apprenticeship and Training, health and welfare, insurance, 17vacations and pensions paid generally, in the locality in 18which the work is being performed, to employees engaged in 19work of a similar character on public works.20(Source: P.A. 102-9, eff. 1-1-22; 102-444, eff. 8-20-21; 21102-673, eff. 11-30-21; 102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 102-1094, eff. 226-15-22; 103-8, eff. 6-7-23; 103-327, eff. 1-1-24; 103-346, 23eff. 1-1-24; 103-359, eff. 7-28-23; 103-447, eff. 8-4-23; 24103-605, eff. 7-1-24.)